Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Chapter 14

Sheep Producers' Indemnity Law

44-14-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Sheep Producers' Indemnity Law.”

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.2 (Williams, § 3830.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2101.

Comparative Legislation. Sheep producers:

Ark. Code §2-34-101 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 246.260.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 270.170.

Va. Code § 3.1-723 et seq.

Collateral References. Agriculture
6.

44-14-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Association” means any association or corporation organized under this chapter;

“Member” includes bona fide sheep producers who meet the requirements of associations organized under this chapter; and

“Person” includes an individual, firm, partnership, corporation and association.

Associations organized hereunder shall be deemed “nonprofit,” inasmuch as they are not organized to make profit for themselves, as such, or for their members, as such, but only for their members as producers.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.3 (Williams, § 3830.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2102.

44-14-103. Who may organize.

Five (5) or more persons, a majority of whom are residents of this state, engaged in the production of sheep, may form a nonprofit cooperative protective association, without capital stock under this chapter.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.4 (Williams, § 3830.5); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2103.

44-14-104. Powers and limitations of association.

Each association organized hereunder has the following powers and limitations:

Indemnity Limited. The indemnity allowed shall in no instance exceed the value of the animal;

Losses Prior to Membership. The association shall not protect the member from losses occurring prior to membership in the association;

Losses While Member in Arrears. The association shall not indemnify a member for losses sustained while the member is in arrears in payment of membership fees, but the member shall be considered to be suspended and without protection until the fees are paid, but shall continue to be liable for all fees due the association;

Loss Caused by Design of Assured. The association shall not be responsible for any loss caused by the design of the assured;

Liability for Assessment. No member shall be liable for assessments to pay losses and expenses accruing previous to the time of the member's membership in the association, nor for losses and expenses accruing after membership ceases;

Joint or Concurrent Indemnity. In all cases of other indemnity against loss by dogs upon the sheep protected in the association, whether prior or subsequent to the date of protection in the association, in the event of loss by dogs, the member will not be entitled to recover on the indemnity in the association any greater portion of the loss sustained than the indemnity in the association shall bear to the whole amount of indemnity on the sheep;

Must Cover All Sheep. The member shall schedule for indemnity all the sheep that the member owns within the territory of the association that are one (1) year of age and over. Lambs produced from ewes insured in the association shall be protected according to the schedule of indemnity payments until one (1) year of age, so long as ownership does not change, without the payment of any fees;

Funds. If, at the end of the fiscal year, there are sufficient funds above and beyond those to be expended for indemnity claims, a reasonable reserve fund shall be set aside; then, if there are still additional funds, the remainder shall be credited to the members pro rata (on a basis as paid into the association) on the ensuing year's fees. If there are not sufficient funds from the fees collected that are available at the end of the fiscal year to pay the indemnity claims as approved in full, then all indemnity payments shall be reduced pro rata;

Term of Indemnity. All indemnity shall date from the date of issuance of certificate of membership. This indemnity ceases at midnight Central Standard Time (12:00 CST) of the last day of the fiscal year;

Renewal of Indemnity. Indemnity shall be renewed only when the member pays all protective fees and otherwise fulfills all requirements as stipulated in the bylaws;

Liability of the Association. The association shall in no instance be liable for loss from other causes than death of sheep caused by dogs;

Cancellation of Membership. A member may, at any time upon written request to the secretary and the payment of all valid claims against the member, have the member's membership in the association cancelled;

Cancellation of Indemnity. The association may, upon five (5) days' notice, for any cause deemed sufficient by the board of directors or its representatives, cancel the indemnity of any member or any part thereof; and

Additional Powers. The association has the power to:

Do each and everything necessary, suitable or proper for the accomplishment of any one (1) of the purposes or the attainment of any one (1) of the subjects herein enumerated, or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association, and to contract accordingly;

Exercise and possess all powers, rights and privileges necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged; and

Have any other rights, powers and privileges granted by the laws of this state to other corporations, except such as are inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.5 (Williams, § 3830.6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2104.

44-14-105. Members.

Under the terms and conditions prescribed in the bylaws adopted by it, the association may admit as members only persons engaged in the production of sheep, including the lessees and tenants of land used for the production of sheep, and any lessors and landlords who receive as rent all or any part of the sheep, or returns therefrom, raised on the leased premises.

If a member of the association is other than a natural person, the member may be represented by any individual, associate officer or manager or member thereof, duly authorized in writing.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.6 (Williams, § 3830.7); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2105.

44-14-106. Articles of incorporation.

Each association formed under this chapter must prepare and file articles of incorporation setting forth:

The name of the association;

The purpose for which it is formed;

The place where its principal business will be transacted;

The term for which it is to exist, not exceeding fifty (50) years; and

The number of directors of the association, which must be not less than five (5) and may be any number in excess of five (5);

The term of office of such directors; and

The names and addresses of those who are to serve as incorporating directors for the first term, and/or until the election and qualification of their successors.

The articles must be subscribed by the incorporators and acknowledged before an officer authorized by the law of this state to take and certify acknowledgments of deeds and conveyances, and shall be filed in accordance with the general incorporation laws of this state.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.7 (Williams, § 3830.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2106.

44-14-107. Amendments to articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation may be altered or amended at any regular meeting or any special meeting called for that purpose. An amendment must first be approved by two thirds (2/3) of the directors and then be adopted by a vote representing a majority of all the members of the association. Amendments to the articles of incorporation, when so adopted, shall be filed in accordance with the general corporation laws of this state.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.8 (Williams, § 3830.9); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2107.

Cross-References. Corporations, title 48.

44-14-108. Bylaws.

Each association incorporated under this chapter must, within thirty (30) days after its incorporation, adopt for its government and management, a code of bylaws not inconsistent with the powers granted under this chapter. A majority vote of the members, or their written assent, is necessary to adopt bylaws.

Each association, under its bylaws, may provide for any or all of the following matters:

The number of members constituting a quorum;

The right of members to vote by proxy or by mail, or both; and the conditions, manner, form and effects of such votes;

The number of directors constituting a quorum;

The qualifications, compensation, duties, term of office of directors and officers; the time of their election and mode and manner of giving notice thereof;

Penalties for violations of the bylaws;

The amount of entrance, organization and membership fees, if any; the manner and method of collection of the same; and the purpose for which they may be used;

The amount that each member shall be required to pay annually or from time to time, if at all, to carry on the business of the association; the charge, if any, to be paid by each member for service rendered by the association to that member and the time of payment and manner of collection; and

The number and qualification of members of the association and the conditions precedent to membership; the method, time, and manner of permitting members to withdraw; the manner of assignment and transfer of the interest of members; the conditions upon which and the time when the membership of any member shall cease; the automatic suspension of the rights of a member when the member ceases to be eligible to membership in the association; the mode, manner and effect of the expulsion of a member; the manner of determining the value of a member's interest and provision for its purchase by the association upon the death or withdrawal of the member, or upon the expulsion of a member for forfeiture of membership, or, at the option of the association, the purchase of the member's interest at a price fixed by conclusive appraisal of the board of directors. In case of the withdrawal or expulsion of a member, the board of directors shall equitably and conclusively appraise the member's property and property interests in the association and fix the amount of the property and property interests in money, which shall be paid to the member within one (1) year after expulsion.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.9 (Williams, § 3830.10); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2108.

44-14-109. General and special meetings — Calling — Notice.

In its bylaws, each association shall provide for one (1) or more regular meetings each year.

The board of directors shall have the right to call a special meeting at any time; and ten percent (10%) of the members may file a petition stating the specific business to be brought before the association and demand a special meeting at any time.

Such meetings must thereupon be called by the directors. Notice of all meetings, together with a statement of the purposes thereof, shall be mailed to each member at least ten (10) days prior to the meeting; provided, that the bylaws may require instead that such notice may be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation, published at the principal place of business of the association.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.10 (Williams, § 3830.11); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2109.

44-14-110. Directors — Election — Compensation — Vacancies.

The affairs of the association shall be managed by a board of not less than five (5) directors elected by the members from their own number. The bylaws may provide that one (1) or more additional directors may be appointed by any public official or commission or by the other directors selected by the members or their delegates. The additional directors shall represent primarily the interest of the general public in such associations. The directors so appointed need not be members of the association, but shall have the same powers and rights as other directors. These directors shall not number more than one fifth (1/5) of the entire number of directors.

An association may provide a fair remuneration for the time actually spent by its officers and directors in its service and for the service of the members of its executive committee.

The bylaws may provide that no director shall occupy any position in the association, except that of president and secretary at a regular salary or substantially full-time pay.

The bylaws may provide for an executive committee and may allot to the committee all the functions and powers of the board, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

When a vacancy on the board occurs other than by expiration of term, the remaining members of the board, by a majority vote, shall fill the vacancy.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.11 (Williams, § 3830.12); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2110.

44-14-111. Election of officers.

The directors shall elect from their number a president and one (1) or more vice presidents. They shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who need not be directors or members of the association; and they may combine the two (2) latter offices and designate the combined office as secretary-treasurer, or unite both functions and titles in one person. The treasurer may be a bank or any depository, and as such, shall not be considered as an officer, but as an agency of the board. In such case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, except that the funds shall be deposited only as and where authorized by the board.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.12 (Williams, § 3830.13); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2111.

44-14-112. Bonding officers, employees, and agents.

Every officer, employee and agent handling funds or negotiable instruments or property of or for any association created under this chapter shall be required to execute and deliver a bond for the faithful performance of that person's duties and obligations.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.13 (Williams, § 3830.14); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2112.

44-14-113. Membership certification — Issuance — Voting — Liability.

When a member of an association has paid the membership fee in full, and has also paid the prescribed protective fees, the member shall receive a certificate of membership. The promissory notes of the members may be accepted by the association as full or partial payment of fees.

No member shall be liable for the debts of the association to an amount exceeding the sum remaining unpaid on the membership fee or the prescribed protective fees, including any unpaid balance on any promissory notes given in payment of such fees.

No member shall be entitled to more than one (1) vote, regardless of the number of sheep owned by such member.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.14 (Williams, § 3830.15); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2113.

44-14-114. Removal of officer or director.

Any member may bring charges against an officer or director by filing them in writing with the secretary of the association, together with a petition signed by five percent (5%) of the members, requesting the removal of the officer or director in question. The removal shall be voted upon at the next regular or special meeting of the association and, by a vote of a majority of the members, the association may remove the officer or director and fill the vacancy. The officer or director, against whom such charges have been brought, shall be informed in writing of the charges previous to the meeting and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person or by counsel and to present witnesses; and the person or persons bringing the charges against the officer or director shall have the same opportunity.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.15 (Williams, § 3830.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2114.

44-14-115. Annual reports.

Each association formed under this chapter shall prepare and make out an annual report on forms to be furnished by the commissioner of commerce and insurance, containing:

The name of the association;

Its principal place of business;

A general statement of its business operations during the fiscal year, showing the number of members, amount of membership fees received, and the amount of prescribed protective fees received;

The total expenses of operations;

The amount of its indebtedness or liability;

Its balance sheets; and

Such other information as may be required by the commissioner.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.16 (Williams, § 3830.17); impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2115.

44-14-116. Conflicting laws not to apply.

Any provisions of law that are in conflict with this chapter shall be construed as not applying to the associations provided for in this chapter.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.17 (Williams, § 3830.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2116.

44-14-117. Application of general corporation laws.

The general corporation laws of this state, and the powers and rights under those laws, shall apply to the associations organized under this chapter, except where those provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter.

None of the provisions of the general insurance laws of the state shall apply to any association or corporation organized under this chapter, except that the department of commerce and insurance shall act in a supervisory capacity and shall be authorized to make an inspection and investigation of the associations' or corporations' books and activities, and may require any reports from the associations or corporations that, in the judgment of the commissioner, are deemed to the best interest of the public.

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.18 (Williams, § 3830.20); impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2117.

44-14-118. Filing fees.

For filing articles of incorporation an association organized under this chapter shall pay five dollars ($5.00); and for filing an amendment to the articles, two dollars ($2.00).

Acts 1939, ch. 184, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.19 (Williams, § 3830.21); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-2118.